apertium-mrj-fin.mrj.lexc
LEXICON PXSG2-SG-INE 
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxsg2%>:%>Ы1штет	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>Е3тӹштӹ	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-LAT 
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg2%>:%>Е3шет	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<lat%>:%>Е3тӹш	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-SG-NOM 
%<pxsg2%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>Е2т		   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-ABE 
%<pl%>%<pxsg2%>%<abe%>:влӓэтде	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:%>Е3твлӓде   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-ACC 
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>Е3твлӓм	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-COM 
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>Е3твлӓге   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg2%>%<com%>:%>влӓэтге	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-COMP
%<pl%>%<pxsg2%>%<comp%>:влӓэтлӓ	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<comp%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓлӓэт	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<comp%>:%>Е3твлӓлӓ  K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-DAT 
%<pl%>%<pxsg2%>%<dat%>:%>влӓэтлӓн   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>Е3твлӓлӓн  K  ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>%<pxsg2%>:%>влӓлӓнет   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>Е3твлӓлӓ   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-GEN 
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>Е3твлӓн	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-ILL 
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxsg2%>:%>влӓшкет	   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>Е3твлӓшкӹ  K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>Е3твлӓш  K  ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓшкет	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-INE 
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxsg2%>:%>влӓштет    K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:%>Е3твлӓштӹ  K  ;
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓштет	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-LAT 
%<pl%>%<lat%>%<pxsg2%>:влӓэшет	   K  ;
!%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>Е3твлӓэш   K  ;
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>Е3твлӓэш   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG2-PL-NOM 
%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>Е2твлӓ	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg2%>:%>влӓэт	   K  ;

!! PXSG3
LEXICON PXSG3-SG-ABE
%<sg%>%<abe%>%<pxsg3%>:%>дежЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<abe%>:%>жЫ1де	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-ACC
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>жЫ1%>м	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-COM
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<com%>:%>жЫ1%>ге	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-COMP
%<sg%>%<comp%>%<pxsg3%>:%>лА1%>жЫ1      K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:%>жЫ1лА1     K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-DAT
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>жЫ1%>лА1н	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-GEN
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>жЫ1%>н	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-ILL
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxsg3%>:%>Ы1шкЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>жЫ1шкЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<ill%>:%>жЫ1ш	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-INE
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxsg3%>:%>Ы1штЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<ine%>:%>жЫ1%>штЫ1	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-LAT
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxsg3%>:%>Е2шЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<lat%>:%>жЫ1ш	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-SG-NOM
%<pxsg3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:%>жЫ1		   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-ABE
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<abe%>:влӓжЫ1де	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<abe%>:%>жЫ1влӓде   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-ACC
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>жЫ1влӓм	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<acc%>:%>влӓжӹм	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-COM
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<com%>:%>жЫ1влӓге   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<com%>:%>влӓжЫ1ге	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-COMP
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<comp%>:влӓжӹлӓ	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<comp%>%<pxsg3%>:влӓлӓжЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<comp%>:%>жЫ1влӓлӓ  K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-DAT
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<dat%>:%>влӓжЫ1лӓн   K  ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>%<pxsg3%>:%>влӓлӓнжЫ1   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>жЫ1влӓлӓн  K  ;
!%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>жЫ1влӓлӓ   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-GEN
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>жЫ1влӓн	   K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<gen%>:%>влӓжӹн	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-ILL
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxsg3%>:%>влӓшкЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<ill%>:%>жЫ1влӓшкӹ  K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<ill%>:%>влӓжЫ1шкӹ  K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<ill%>:%>влӓжЫ1ш  K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-INE
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxsg3%>:%>влӓштЫ1жЫ1    K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<ine%>:%>жЫ1влӓштӹ  K  ;
%<pl%>%<pxsg3%>%<ine%>:влӓжЫ1штЫ1	   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-LAT
%<pl%>%<lat%>%<pxsg3%>:влӓэшЫ1жЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>жЫ1влӓэш   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<lat%>:%>жЫ1влӓш   K  ;

LEXICON PXSG3-PL-NOM
%<pl%>%<nom%>%<pxsg3%>:%>влӓжЫ1	   K  ;
%<pxsg3%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>жЫ1влӓ	   K  ;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-ABE 
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<abe%>:%>нА1%>те	K	;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-ACC 
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<acc%>:%>нА1%>Ы1м	K	;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-COM 
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<com%>:%>нА1%>ге	K	;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-COMP
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<comp%>:%>нА1%>лА1	K	;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-DAT 
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<dat%>:%>нА1%>лА1н	K	;
%<sg%>%<dat%>%<pxpl1%>:%>лА1н%>нА1	K	;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-GEN 
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<gen%>:%>нА1%>Ы1н	K	;

LEXICON PXPL1-SG-ILL 
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxpl1%>:%>Ы1шкЫ1%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-SG-INE 
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxpl1%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-SG-LAT 
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxpl1%>:%>Е2ш%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-SG-NOM 
%<sg%>%<pxpl1%>%<nom%>:%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-ABE 
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<abe%>:%>влӓ%>нА1%>те	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-ACC 
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<acc%>:%>влӓ%>нА1%>Ы1м	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-COM 
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<com%>:%>влӓ%>нА1%>ге	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-COMP
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<comp%>:%>влӓ%>нА1%>лА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-DAT 
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<dat%>:%>влӓ%>нА1%>лА1н	K	;
%<pl%>%<dat%>%<pxpl1%>:%>влӓ%>лА1н%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-GEN 
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<gen%>:%>влӓ%>нА1%>Ы1н	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-ILL 
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxpl1%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1шкЫ1%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-INE 
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxpl1%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-LAT 
%<pl%>%<lat%>%<pxpl1%>:%>влӓ%>Е2ш%>нА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL1-PL-NOM 
%<pl%>%<pxpl1%>%<nom%>:%>влӓ%>нА1	K	;
!!PxPl2
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-ABE 
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<abe%>:%>дА1%>те	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-ACC 
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<acc%>:%>дА1%>Ы1м	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-COM 
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<com%>:%>дА1%>ге	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-COMP
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<comp%>:%>дА1%>лА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-DAT 
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<dat%>:%>дА1%>лА1н	K	;
%<sg%>%<dat%>%<pxpl2%>:%>лА1н%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-GEN 
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<gen%>:%>дА1%>Ы1н	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-ILL 
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxpl2%>:%>Ы1шкЫ1%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-INE 
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxpl2%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-LAT 
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxpl2%>:%>Е2ш%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-SG-NOM 
%<sg%>%<pxpl2%>%<nom%>:%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-ABE
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<abe%>:%>влӓ%>дА1%>те	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-ACC
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<acc%>:%>влӓ%>дА1%>Ы1м	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-COM
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<com%>:%>влӓ%>дА1%>ге	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-COMP
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<comp%>:%>влӓ%>дА1%>лА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-DAT
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<dat%>:%>влӓ%>дА1%>лА1н	K	;
%<pl%>%<dat%>%<pxpl2%>:%>влӓ%>лА1н%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-GEN
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<gen%>:%>влӓ%>дА1%>Ы1н	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-ILL
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxpl2%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1шкЫ1%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-INE
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxpl2%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-LAT
%<pl%>%<lat%>%<pxpl2%>:%>влӓ%>Е2ш%>дА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL2-PL-NOM
%<pl%>%<pxpl2%>%<nom%>:%>влӓ%>дА1	K	;
!!PxPl3
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-ABE 
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<abe%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>те	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-ACC 
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<acc%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>Ы1м	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-COM 
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<com%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>ге	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-COMP
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<comp%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>лА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-DAT 
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<dat%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>лА1н	K	;
%<sg%>%<dat%>%<pxpl3%>:%>лА1н%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-GEN 
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<gen%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>Ы1н	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-ILL 
%<sg%>%<ill%>%<pxpl3%>:%>Ы1шкЫ1%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-INE 
%<sg%>%<ine%>%<pxpl3%>:%>Ы1штЫ1%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-LAT 
%<sg%>%<lat%>%<pxpl3%>:%>Е2ш%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-SG-NOM 
%<sg%>%<pxpl3%>%<nom%>:%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-ABE 
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<abe%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>те	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-ACC 
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<acc%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>Ы1м	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-COM 
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<com%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>ге	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-COMP
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<comp%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>лА1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-DAT 
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<dat%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>лА1н	K	;
%<pl%>%<dat%>%<pxpl3%>:%>влӓ%>лА1н%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-GEN 
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<gen%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>Ы1н	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-ILL 
%<pl%>%<ill%>%<pxpl3%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1шкЫ1%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-INE 
%<pl%>%<ine%>%<pxpl3%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-LAT 
%<pl%>%<lat%>%<pxpl3%>:%>влӓ%>Е2ш%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;
LEXICON PXPL3-PL-NOM 
%<pl%>%<pxpl3%>%<nom%>:%>влӓ%>Ы1штЫ1	K	;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! !!!Pronouns
!! ----

!! Hill Mari (Western Mari) pronouns...

LEXICON PRON_
%<pron%>: # ;

LEXICON pronouns
ик:ик PRON_   ; !"eräs"
икманярын:икманярын PRON_   ; !"muutaman"
иктӓ-весӹ:иктӓ-весӹ PRON_   ; !""
иктӓ-гӓнӓ:иктӓ-гӓнӓ PRON_   ; !"joskus"
иктӓ-кыце:иктӓ-кыце PRON_   ; !"jotenkin"
иктӓ-кышак:иктӓ-кышак PRON_   ; !"johonkin"
иктӓ-кышец:иктӓ-кышец PRON_   ; !"jostakin"
иктӓ-ма:иктӓ-ма PRON_   ; !"jokin; jotakin"
иктӓ-мазар:иктӓ-мазар PRON_   ; !""
иктӓ-маняр:иктӓ-маняр PRON_   ; !""
иктӓ-махань:иктӓ-махань PRON_   ; !"jonkinlainen"
иктӓжӹ:иктӓжӹ PRON_   ; !"joku; jotkut"
иктӓ•-маняр-гӹнят:иктӓ-маняр-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
иктӓ•-махань-гӹнят:иктӓ-махань-гӹнят PRON_   ; !"jonkinlainen"
иктӹ:иктӹ PRON_   ; !"yksi; sama"
иктӹт:иктӹт PRON_   ; !"yksi; sama"
икӹжӓк-иктӹ:икӹжӓк-иктӹ PRON_   ; !""
йыхи-яхи:йыхи-яхи PRON_   ; !""
керек-кынам:керек-кынам PRON_   ; !""
керек-кышак:керек-кышак PRON_   ; !""
керек-кышкы:керек-кышкы PRON_   ; !""
керек-кӱ:керек-кӱ PRON_   ; !""
керек-маняр:керек-маняр PRON_   ; !""
кыды:кыды PRON_   ; !"kuka; kumpi; mikä; joka"
кыды-кынам:кыды-кынам PRON_   ; !""
кыды-кынар:кыды-кынар PRON_   ; !""
кыды-кышкевек:кыды-кышкевек PRON_   ; !""
кыды-тидӹ:кыды-тидӹ PRON_   ; !""
кыдыжы:кыдыжы PRON_   ; !""
кынам-гӹнят:кынам-гӹнят PRON_   ; !"joskus; jolloinkin"
кынамеш:кынамеш PRON_   ; !""
кынамшы:кынамшы PRON_   ; !""
кынар-гӹнят:кынар-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
кынары:кынары PRON_   ; !"montako"
кыце:кыце PRON_   ; !"miten; kuten"
кыце-шон:кыце-шон PRON_   ; !"miten vain"
кыцежӹ-мажы:кыцежӹ-мажы PRON_   ; !""
кышак:кышак PRON_   ; !"mihin"
кышак-тишӓк:кышак-тишӓк PRON_   ; !""
кышак-ӓнят:кышак-ӓнят PRON_   ; !""
кышакен-гӹнят:кышакен-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
кышец-гӹнят:кышец-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
кышец-шон:кышец-шон PRON_   ; !""
кышецын:кышецын PRON_   ; !""
кышкевек-гӹнят:кышкевек-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
кышкевек-ӓнят:кышкевек-ӓнят PRON_   ; !""
кышкы-гӹнят:кышкы-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
кышкы-шон:кышкы-шон PRON_   ; !""
кыштакен:кыштакен PRON_   ; !""
кышты:кышты PRON_   ; !""
кышты-тиштӹ:кышты-тиштӹ PRON_   ; !""
кышты-ӓнят:кышты-ӓнят PRON_   ; !""
кӱ:кӱ PRON_   ; !"kuka"
кӱ-шон:кӱ-шон PRON_   ; !""
ма:ма PRON_   ; !"mikä"
ма-шон:ма-шон PRON_   ; !"jokin; jotakin"
мааш:мааш PRON_   ; !""
магӹц-ӓнят:магӹц-ӓнят PRON_   ; !""
мазар-гӹнят:мазар-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
мазараш:мазараш PRON_   ; !""
мазары:мазары PRON_   ; !""
малан-гӹнят:малан-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
малын:малын PRON_   ; !"miksi"
маняр-гӹнят:маняр-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
маняраш:маняраш PRON_   ; !""
манярымшы:манярымшы PRON_   ; !""
махань-шон:махань-шон PRON_   ; !""
молнамшы:молнамшы PRON_   ; !"aikaisempi"
нигыды:нигыды PRON_   ; !""
нигышак:нигышак PRON_   ; !"mihinkään"
нигышты:нигышты PRON_   ; !"missään"
нималан:нималан PRON_   ; !"millekään"
седӹге:седӹге PRON_   ; !""
седӹнӓр:седӹнӓр PRON_   ; !""
тагыды:тагыды PRON_   ; !"jokin"
тагынам:тагынам PRON_   ; !"milloin"
тагынамшы:тагынамшы PRON_   ; !""
тагыш:тагыш PRON_   ; !"johonkin"
тагышакен:тагышакен PRON_   ; !""
тагышецӹн:тагышецӹн PRON_   ; !"jostakin"
тагышты:тагышты PRON_   ; !""
тама-гӹнят:тама-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
тамалан-гӹнят:тамалан-гӹнят PRON_   ; !""
тамалын-ӓнят:тамалын-ӓнят PRON_   ; !""
таманяреш:таманяреш PRON_   ; !""
тамахань:тамахань PRON_   ; !""
теве:теве PRON_   ; !""
техеньӹ:техеньӹ PRON_   ; !"sellainen"
тинӓрӹ:тинӓрӹ PRON_   ; !""
тишкевек:тишкевек PRON_   ; !""
тишӓк:тишӓк PRON_   ; !"tähän"
тӓгӱ-ӓнят:тӓгӱ-ӓнят PRON_   ; !""
тӹвелнӹ:тӹвелнӹ PRON_   ; !""
тӹвецӹн:тӹвецӹн PRON_   ; !""
тӹгодымшы:тӹгодымшы PRON_   ; !""
тӹнгелӓ:тӹнгелӓ PRON_   ; !""
тӹнӓмеш:тӹнӓмеш PRON_   ; !""
тӹнӓрӓш:тӹнӓрӓш PRON_   ; !""
тӹун:тӹун PRON_   ; !""
тӹшец-тишец:тӹшец-тишец PRON_   ; !""
тӹшкӓн-тӹшкӓн:тӹшкӓн-тӹшкӓн PRON_   ; !""
тӹштӹ:тӹштӹ PRON_   ; !""
тӹшӓкен:тӹшӓкен PRON_   ; !""
хоть-кынар:хоть-кынар PRON_   ; !""
хоть-кышкы:хоть-кышкы PRON_   ; !""
хоть-маняр:хоть-маняр PRON_   ; !""
цилӓ:цилӓ PRON_   ; !"kaikki"
южнам:южнам PRON_   ; !"joskus"
ӓнят-кынары:ӓнят-кынары PRON_   ; !""
ӓнят-кышецын:ӓнят-кышецын PRON_   ; !""
ӓнят-кӱ:ӓнят-кӱ PRON_   ; !"joku"
ӓнят-маняр:ӓнят-маняр PRON_   ; !""
ӓнят-тама:ӓнят-тама PRON_   ; !""
ӓнят-таманяр:ӓнят-таманяр PRON_   ; !""
